test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-amp_gt-norm.yaml
# Author: Csilla HORVATH (Szeged Team)

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)

  Noun - амп: # "(eng) boat/(hun) csónak/(rus) лодка"  - full paradigm
     амп+N+Sg+Nom: амп
     амп+N+Sg+Loc: ампыт
     амп+N+Sg+Lat: ампын
     амп+N+Sg+Abl: ампныл
     амп+N+Sg+Ins: ампыл
     амп+N+Sg+Tra: ампыг

     амп+N+Du+Nom: ампыг
     амп+N+Du+Loc: ампыгт
     амп+N+Du+Lat: ампыгн
     амп+N+Du+Abl: ампыгныл
     амп+N+Du+Ins: ампыгтыл

     амп+N+Pl+Nom: ампыт
     амп+N+Pl+Loc: ампытт
     амп+N+Pl+Lat: ампытн
     амп+N+Pl+Abl: ампытныл
     амп+N+Pl+Ins: ампытыл

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ампум
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ампумт
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: ампумн
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ампумныл
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: ампумтыл
     амп+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: ампумыг

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ампагум
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: ампагумт
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: ампагумн
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: ампагумныл
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: ампагумтыл

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ампанум
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ампанумт
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ампанумн
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ампанумныл
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: ампанумтыл

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ампын
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ампынт
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: ампынн
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ампынныл
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: ампынтыл
     амп+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: ампыныг

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ампагын, ампагн]
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: ампагынт
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: ампагынн
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: ампагынныл
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: ампагынтыл

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [ампанын, ампан]
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ампанынт, ампант]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [ампанынн, ампанн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ампанынныл, ампанныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [ампанынтыл, ампантыл]

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ампе
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ампе̄т, ампет]
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [ампе̄н, ампен]
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [ампе̄ныл, ампеныл]
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [ампе̄тыл, ампетыл]
     амп+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [ампе̄г, ампег]

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ампаге
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [ампаге̄т, ампагет]
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [ампаге̄н, ампаген]
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [ампаге̄ныл, ампагеныл]
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [ампаге̄тыл, ампагетыл]

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ампанэ
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ампанэ̄т, ампанэт]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [ампанэ̄н, ампанэн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ампанэ̄ныл, ампанэныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [ампанэ̄тыл, ампанэтыл]

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [ампме̄н, ампмен]
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [ампме̄нт, ампмент]
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [ампме̄нн, ампменн]
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ампме̄нныл, ампменныл]
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [ампме̄нтыл, ампментыл]

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ампагаме̄н, ампагамен, ампагме̄н]
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [ампагаме̄нт, ампагамент, ампагме̄нт]
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [ампагаме̄нн, ампагаменн, ампагме̄нн]
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [ампагаме̄нныл, ампагаменныл, ампагме̄нныл]
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [ампагаме̄нтыл, ампагаментыл, ампагме̄нтыл]

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [ампанаме̄н, ампанамен]
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ампанаме̄нт, ампанамент]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [ампанаме̄нн, ампанаменн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ампанаме̄нныл, ампанаменныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [ампанаме̄нтыл, ампанаментыл]

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [ампын, ампы̄н]
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [ампынт, ампы̄нт] 
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [ампынн, ампы̄нн]
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [ампынныл, ампы̄нныл]
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [ампынтыл, ампы̄нтыл]

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ампагын, ампагы̄н]
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [ампагынт, ампагы̄нт]
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [ампагынн, ампагы̄нн]
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [ампагынныл, ампагы̄нныл]
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [ампагынтыл, ампагы̄нтыл]

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [ампанын, ампаны̄н, ампан]
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ампанынт, ампаны̄нт, ампант]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [ампанынн, ампаны̄нн, ампанн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ампанынныл, ампаны̄нныл, ампанныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [ампанынтыл, ампаны̄нтыл, ампантыл]

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [ампе̄н, ампен]
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [ампе̄нт, ампент]
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [ампе̄нн, ампенн]
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [ампе̄нныл, ампенныл]
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [ампе̄нтыл, ампентыл]

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ампаге̄н, ампаген]
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [ампаге̄нт, ампагент]
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [ампаге̄нн, ампагенн]
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [ампаге̄нныл, ампагенныл]
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [ампаге̄нтыл, ампагентыл]

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [ампанэ̄н, ампанэн]
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ампанэ̄нт, ампанэнт]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [ампанэ̄нн, ампанэнн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ампанэ̄нныл, ампанэнныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [ампанэ̄нтыл, ампанэнтыл]

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ампув
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ампувт
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: ампувн
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ампувныл
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: ампувтыл

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ампагув
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: ампагувт
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: ампагувн
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: ампагувныл
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: ампагувтыл

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ампанув
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ампанувт
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: ампанувн
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ампанувныл
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: ампанувтыл

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [ампын, ампы̄н] 
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ампынт, ампы̄нт]
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [ампынн, ампы̄нн]
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [ампынныл, ампы̄нныл]
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [ампынтыл, ампы̄нтыл]

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ампагын, ампагы̄н]
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [ампагынт, ампагы̄нт]
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [ампагынн, ампагы̄нн]
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [ампагынныл, ампагы̄нныл]
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [ампагынтыл, ампагы̄нтыл]

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [ампанын, ампаны̄н, ампан]
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ампанынт, ампаны̄нт, ампант]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [ампанынн, ампаны̄нн, ампанн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ампанынныл, ампаны̄нныл, ампанныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [ампанынтыл, ампаны̄нтыл, ампантыл]

     амп+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ампаныл
     амп+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ампанылт
     амп+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: ампанылн
     амп+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ампанылныл
     амп+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: ампанылтыл

     амп+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ампаганыл
     амп+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: ампаганылт
     амп+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: ампаганылн
     амп+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: ампаганылныл
     амп+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: ампаганылтыл

     амп+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [ампананыл, ампаныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ампананылт, ампанылт]
     амп+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [ампананылн, ампанылн]
     амп+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ампананылныл, ампанылныл]
     амп+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [ампананылтыл, ампанылтыл]
